src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc
LEXICON NUM_51kolmeseptiljardia

+Pl+Abe:ittaseptiljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltaseptiljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illaseptiljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illeseptiljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:ineseptiljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istaseptiljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inaseptiljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ienseptiljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iinseptiljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issaseptiljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:inseptiljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:etseptiljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iaseptiljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksiseptiljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ettaseptiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:eltaseptiljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ellaseptiljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:elleseptiljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:estaseptiljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:enaseptiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:enseptiljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:eenseptiljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:essaseptiljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:eseptiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:easeptiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksiseptiljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kolmeseptiljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:ittaseptiljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltaseptiljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illaseptiljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illeseptiljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:ineseptiljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istaseptiljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inaseptiljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ienseptiljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iinseptiljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issaseptiljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:inseptiljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:etseptiljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iaseptiljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksiseptiljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ettaseptiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:eltaseptiljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ellaseptiljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:elleseptiljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:estaseptiljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:enaseptiljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:enseptiljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:eenseptiljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:essaseptiljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:eseptiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:easeptiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksiseptiljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kolmetoista

+Pl+Abe:ittatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illetoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inetoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ientoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iintoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ettoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksitoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ettatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:eltatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ellatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:elletoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:estatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:enatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:entoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:eentoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:essatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:etoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:eatoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksitoista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kolmetredekiljardia

+Pl+Abe:ittatredekiljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltatredekiljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illatredekiljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illetredekiljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inetredekiljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istatredekiljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inatredekiljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ientredekiljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iintredekiljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issatredekiljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:intredekiljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ettredekiljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iatredekiljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksitredekiljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ettatredekiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:eltatredekiljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ellatredekiljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:elletredekiljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:estatredekiljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:enatredekiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:entredekiljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:eentredekiljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:essatredekiljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:etredekiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:eatredekiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksitredekiljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kolmetredekiljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:ittatredekiljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltatredekiljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illatredekiljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illetredekiljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inetredekiljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istatredekiljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inatredekiljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ientredekiljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iintredekiljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issatredekiljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:intredekiljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ettredekiljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iatredekiljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksitredekiljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ettatredekiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:eltatredekiljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ellatredekiljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:elletredekiljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:estatredekiljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:enatredekiljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:entredekiljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:eentredekiljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:essatredekiljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:etredekiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:eatredekiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksitredekiljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kolmetriljardia

+Pl+Abe:ittatriljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:iltatriljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:illatriljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:illetriljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:inetriljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:istatriljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:inatriljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:ientriljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:iintriljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:issatriljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:intriljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:ettriljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:iatriljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:iksitriljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ettatriljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:eltatriljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:ellatriljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:elletriljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:estatriljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:enatriljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:entriljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:eentriljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:essatriljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:etriljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:eatriljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:eksitriljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
kolmeseptiljardia+Num:kolm  NUM_51kolmeseptiljardia  ;
kolmeseptiljoonaa+Num:kolm  NUM_51kolmeseptiljoonaa  ;
kolmetoista+Num:kolm  NUM_51kolmetoista  ;
kolmetredekiljardia+Num:kolm  NUM_51kolmetredekiljardia  ;
kolmetredekiljoonaa+Num:kolm  NUM_51kolmetredekiljoonaa  ;
kolmetriljardia+Num:kolm  NUM_51kolmetriljardia  ;
